Montana, session 2025, HB124.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Riding on roadways. (1) A person operating a bicycle on a roadway
without a flag vehicle escort shall ride opposite the flow of traffic.
(2) A person operating a bicycle on a roadway with a flag vehicle escort shall ride with the flow of
traffic.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Repealer. The following sections of the Montana Code Annotated are
repealed:
61-8-602. Traffic laws applicable to persons operating bicycles or mopeds.
61-8-605. Riding on roadways.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 61, chapter 8, part 6, and the provisions of Title 61, chapter 8, part 6, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 124